Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5859
Department; decision; appeal procedures.

The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations establishing procedures in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act by which the applicant may appeal a decision by the department. The applicant may appeal a final decision of the department to the district court in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1979, LB 172, § 59;

Laws 1982, LB 378, § 49;

Laws 1989, LB 429, § 31;

Laws 1997, LB 798, § 32;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 636.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.